District of Columbia statutes.
29-105.10

Transfer of registration.

(a)

A registered foreign entity that merges into a nonregistered foreign entity or converts to a foreign entity required to register with the Mayor to do business in the District shall deliver to the Mayor for filing an application for transfer of registration. The application shall be signed by the entity and state the:

(1)

Name of the registered foreign entity before merger or conversion;

(2)

Type of entity it was before the merger or conversion;

(3)

Name of the applicant entity and, if the name does not comply with § 29-103.01, an alternate name adopted pursuant to § 29-105.06(a);

(4)

Type of applicant entity and its jurisdiction of formation; and

(5)

Following information regarding the applicant entity or to which it has been converted, if different than the information for the foreign entity before the merger or conversion:

(A)

The street and mailing address of the principal office of the entity and, if the law of the entity’s jurisdiction of formation requires it to maintain an office in that jurisdiction, the street and mailing address of that office; and

(B)

The information required by § 29-104.04(a).

(b)

When an application for transfer of registration takes effect, the registration of the registered foreign entity to do business in the District shall be transferred without interruption to the entity into which it has merged or to which it has been converted.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(37), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.